California statutes. Water Code
The board shall include as a condition in any permit under which a reservoir with an impounding capacity of 50 acre-feet or more is to be constructed, that the permittee shall clear the site of the proposed reservoir of all structures, trees, and other vegetation which would interfere with the use of the reservoir for water storage and recreatonal purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 984.)
-------------------------------------------

1394.

(a) The board may reserve jurisdiction, in whole or in part, to amend, revise, supplement, or delete terms and conditions in a permit under either of the following circumstances:

(1) If the board finds that sufficient information is not available to finally determine the terms and conditions which will reasonably protect vested rights without resulting in waste of water or which will best develop, conserve, and utilize in the public interest the water sought to be appropriated, and that a period of actual operation or time for completion of studies will be necessary in order to secure the required information.

(2) If the application or applications being acted upon represent only part of a coordinated project, other applications for the project being pending, and the board finds that the coordinated project requires coordinated terms and conditions which cannot reasonably be decided upon until a decision is reached on the other pending applications.

(b) Jurisdiction shall be reserved under this section for no longer period of time than the board finds to be reasonably necessary, and in no case shall jurisdiction be exercised after the issuance of the license. The jurisdiction shall be exercised only after notice to the parties and a hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 659, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Application to Beneficial Use and Construction of Works [1395. - 1398.]

1395.

Actual construction work upon any project shall begin within the time specified in the permit, which time shall not be less than 60 days from the date of the permit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1396.

The construction of the work thereafter and the utilization of water for beneficial purposes shall be prosecuted with due diligence in accordance with this division, the terms of the permit, and the rules and regulations of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1397.

The work shall be completed and the water applied to beneficial use in accordance with this division, the rules and regulations of the board, and the terms of the permit and within the period specified in the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1398.

(a) The period specified in the permit for beginning construction work, for completion of construction work, for application of the water to beneficial use, or any or all of these periods may, for good cause shown, be extended by the board.

(b) After any hearing on a petition to extend the period or periods, the board may revoke the permit in accordance with Section 1410.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Revocation of Permit [1410. - 1410.2.]

1410.

(a) There shall be cause for revocation of a permit if the work is not commenced, prosecuted with due diligence, and completed or the water applied to beneficial use as contemplated in the permit and in accordance with this division and the rules and regulations of the board.

(b) A permit may be revoked upon request of the permittee or under either of the following procedures:

(1) If, after a hearing on a petition for extension of time to complete a project and apply water to beneficial use, the board finds that cause exists to revoke the permit, the board may revoke the permit.

(2) If, after an investigation other than a hearing on a petition for extension of time, it appears that cause exists to revoke a permit, the board shall give notice of proposed revocation in writing, mailed in a sealed, prepaid postage and certified letter to the permittee at his or her last known address. If the permittee fails to request a hearing with the time provided under Section 1410.1, the board shall revoke the permit and declare the water subject to appropriation. After a hearing, when a hearing is requested by the permittee pursuant to Section 1410.1, the board may, upon a finding that cause exists, revoke the permit and declare the water subject to appropriation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 13.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1410.1.

The notice of proposed revocation of the permit pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1410 shall contain a statement of facts and information upon which the proposed revocation is based, and shall include a statement substantially in the following form:

Unless a written request for a hearing signed by or on behalf of the permittee is delivered or mailed to the board within 15 days after receipt of this notice, the board may act upon the proposed revocation of the permit without a hearing. Any request for a hearing may be made by delivering or mailing the request to the board at the address given on the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 670, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1410.2.

In any case when a permit is revoked without a hearing, as provided in Section 1410.1, the permittee, within 90 days of the date of the order of revocation, may file with the board a request to set aside the revocation, and the board, for good cause shown, may reinstate the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 794.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Temporary Permits [1425. - 1433.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. Temporary Urgency Permits [1425. - 1431.]

1425.

(a) Any person, whether or not an applicant, permittee, or licensee under provisions of this division other than this article, who has an urgent need to divert and use water may apply for, and the board may issue, a conditional, temporary permit without complying with other procedures or provisions of this division, but subject to all requirements of this article.

(b) Prior to issuing a permit pursuant to this article, the board shall make all of the following findings:

(1) The applicant has an urgent need for the water proposed to be diverted and used.

(2) The water may be diverted and used without injury to any lawful user of water.

(3) The water may be diverted and used without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses.

(4) The proposed diversion and use are in the public interest, including findings to support permit conditions imposed to ensure that the water is diverted and used in the public interest, without injury to any lawful user of water, and without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, and other instream beneficial uses.

(c) “Urgent need,” for the purposes of this article, means the existence of circumstances from which the board may in its judgment conclude that the
 proposed temporary diversion and use is necessary to further the constitutional policy that the water resources of the state be put to beneficial use to the fullest extent of which they are capable and that waste of water be prevented; except that the board shall not find an applicant’s need to be urgent if the board in its judgment concludes, if applicable, that the applicant has not exercised due diligence either (1) in making application for a permit pursuant to provisions of this division other than this article, or (2) in pursuing that application to permit.

(d) The board may delegate to any officer or employee of the board all or any of its functions under this article, as provided in Section 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 5.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1426.

The application for a temporary permit shall be completed in accordance with the provisions of Section 1260 and shall be accompanied by such maps, drawings, and other data as may be required by the board, and the applicant shall pay an application fee, and a permit fee if a temporary permit is issued, both computed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

1427.

Before making the findings required by Section 1425, the board shall do all of the following:

 (a) Review available records, files, and decisions that relate to the availability of water from the source at the proposed point of diversion to serve the proposed temporary diversion and use, and that relate to the rights of downstream users.

(b) Consult with representatives of the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(c) Make a field investigation, if necessary or desirable in the opinion of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 53.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1428.

The board may issue a temporary permit in advance of the notice required by this section. In all cases, whether or not a temporary permit has been issued, the board shall, as soon as practicable after the receipt of an application, issue and deliver to the applicant or permittee a notice of the application or permit, which includes the information required by Section 1301. Publication or posting of the notice shall be as follows:

(a) If the application or permit is for more than three cubic feet per second or for more than 200 acre-feet of storage, and if the permit is to remain in effect for more than 30 days, the notice shall be published by and at the expense of the applicant or permittee at the earliest practicable time, not to exceed 20 days from the date of issuance of the notice, in a newspaper having a general circulation and published within the county wherein the point of diversion lies. Proof of publication shall be by copy of the notice as published and made part of an affidavit filed with the board within 10 days of publication.

(b) In all other cases, unless the permit is to be in effect less than 10 days:

(1) The applicant or permittee shall post the notice in at least two conspicuous places in the locality to be affected by the diversion and use. Notices shall be posted not later than two days after receipt of the notice by the applicant or permittee. An affidavit containing proof of posting shall be filed with the board within seven days of the date of notice.

(2) The board shall send a copy of the notice by registered mail to each person who, in the judgment of the board, could be adversely affected by the temporary diversion and use.

(c) Regardless of the rate of diversion or the amount of storage, if the permit is to be in effect less than 10 days, the board shall exercise its discretion with respect to requiring notice, both before and after issuance of the temporary permit, and may require such proof of notice as it deems appropriate.

(d) Any interested person may file objection to the temporary diversion and use with the board and shall send a copy to the applicant or permittee.

(e) The board shall give prompt consideration to any objection, and may hold a hearing thereon, after notice to all interested persons.

(f) Failure of the permittee to comply with any requirement of this section shall result in the automatic termination of the temporary permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

1429.

The board shall supervise diversion and use of water under the temporary permit for the protection of all lawful users of waters and instream beneficial uses and for compliance with permit conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 455, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1430.

A temporary permit issued under this article shall not result in the creation of a vested right, even of a temporary nature, but shall be subject at all times to modification or revocation in the discretion of the board. The authorization to divert and use water under a temporary permit shall automatically expire 180 days after the authorization takes effect, unless an earlier date is specified or the temporary permit is revoked. The 180-day period does not include any time required for monitoring, reporting, or mitigation before or after the authorization to divert or use water under the temporary permit. If the temporary permit authorizes diversion to storage, the 180-day period is a limitation on the authorization to divert and not a limitation on the authorization
 for beneficial use of water diverted to storage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 6.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1431.

A temporary permit issued under this article may be renewed by the board. Requests for renewals shall be processed in the manner provided by this article, except that the permittee shall not be required to file duplicate maps, drawings, or other data if they were furnished with the original application. Each such renewal shall be valid for a period not to exceed 180 days from the date of renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 7.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Temporary Permits for Diversion to Underground Storage [1433. - 1433.6.]

1433.

(a) Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(1) “Basin” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(2) “Groundwater sustainability agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(3) “Local agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(b) This article shall not apply to diversions within the groundwater basins identified in paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) of, or subdivision (c) of, Section 10720.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 8.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1433.1.

(a) A groundwater sustainability agency or a local agency, whether or not an applicant, permittee, or licensee under provisions of this division other than this article, may apply for, and the board may issue, a conditional temporary permit for diversion of surface water to underground storage for beneficial use that advances the sustainability goal of a groundwater basin under Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6, without complying with other procedures or provisions of this division, subject to all requirements of this article. An application may be filed under this article whether or not there is an adopted groundwater sustainability plan, an interim plan, or an alternative under Section 10733.6 for the
 basin. 

(b) Before issuing a permit pursuant to this article, the board shall make all of the following findings based upon a preponderance of the evidence:

(1) The proposed diversion is to underground storage for beneficial use consistent with subdivision (a). 

(2) The water may be diverted and used without injury to any lawful user of water, including the user’s ability to meet water quality objectives. This finding may be satisfied by demonstrating both of the following:

(A) The proposed diversion to underground storage will occur only when both of the following conditions are satisfied: 

(i) Flow in the source waterbody exceeds the claims of all known legal users who divert water downstream of the proposed point of diversion.

(ii) Unregulated flow in the source waterbody will be sufficient below the proposed point of diversion to meet instream flow requirements and water quality objectives. 

(B) To prevent injury to existing legal users of water, storage and extraction from storage in the basin under the proposed permit will be subject to accounting methods and reporting requirements established
 by any of the following:

 (i) A groundwater sustainability plan.

(ii) An interim plan.

(iii) An alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6.

(iv) The board, in applying conditions to the permit.

(3) The water may be diverted and used without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses. If the permit
 does not include a condition proposed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1433.2, the board shall include in the findings an explanation of why the condition is not included.

(4) The proposed diversion and use are in the public interest, including findings to support permit conditions imposed to ensure that the water is diverted and used in the public interest.

(5) If there is an adopted groundwater sustainability plan, an interim plan, or an alternative under Section 10733.6 for the basin, the proposed diversion to underground storage is consistent with that plan or alternative.

(c) The board may
 delegate to any officer or employee of the board all or any of its functions under this article, as provided in Section 7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 8.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1433.2.

(a) The application for a temporary permit shall be completed in accordance with Section 1260 and shall be accompanied by any maps, drawings, and other data that may be required by the board.

(b) (1) An applicant shall pay an application fee and, if a permit is issued, a permit fee, both in amounts calculated in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525).

(2) Consistent with Section 3 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and the board’s authority to set fees to promote the conservation and utilization of water resources in
 the public interest, the board may adopt reduced fees under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525) for applications, petitions, and permits under this article.

(c) In addition to subdivisions (a) and (b), an application shall include all of the following:

(1) Evidence that the applicant has completed any environmental review required by, or the project is exempt from, the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code). To the extent funding is available, the board shall review and comment on any notice of preparation or draft environmental document for a project subject to approval under this article, and include in the board’s comments identification of any instream beneficial uses of waters of the state that
 may be affected by the project. This paragraph is not a limitation on the authority of the board under any other law.

(2) A notification from the Department of Fish and Wildlife that the applicant has consulted with the Department of Fish and Wildlife at least 30 days before submission of the application. If the Department of Fish and Wildlife determines that it needs additional time for review, it may provide for a longer consultation period, not to exceed 60 days. The notification shall include a copy of any conditions proposed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a water availability analysis that quantifies, under a range of foreseeable hydrologic conditions, the amount of unappropriated water available
 considering all known legal users who divert water hydrologically connected to the proposed point of diversion, effects on beneficial uses, including instream beneficial uses, and the ability to meet water quality objectives.

(B) A simplified water availability analysis, if the applicant proposes to divert water only when flow in the source waterbody exceeds an established or calculated flood stage, or if the applicant requests board consideration of a simplified water availability analysis prior to submittal of the application, and the deputy director finds that a simplified water availability analysis is sufficient for the board to make the findings required by subdivision (b) of Section 1433.1. 

(4) A proposed accounting method for storage and extraction of water diverted
 under the permit that is either of the following: 

(A) Certified to be consistent with the groundwater sustainability plan or alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6 by the groundwater sustainability agency for the basin where the water is proposed to be stored or the local agency responsible for
 implementing the approved alternative.

(B) If there is no applicable groundwater sustainability plan or alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6, adequate to demonstrate beneficial use of water under the proposed permit and not inconsistent with the department’s standards in Section 356.2 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 8.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1433.3.

(a) As soon as practicable after the receipt of an application, the board shall issue and deliver to the applicant a notice of the application that includes the information required by Section 1301 and a list of persons who, in the judgment of the board, could be adversely affected by the temporary diversion and use. The board shall post the notice to its internet website within 10 days of issuing the notice to the applicant.

(b) The applicant shall provide notice by registered or electronic mail to each person on the list of interested persons provided by the board and the list of interested persons maintained by any groundwater sustainability agency or local agency
 for the basin where the water is proposed to be stored. The applicant shall
 provide proof of notice to the board.

(c) Any interested person may file an objection to the temporary diversion and use with the board within 30 days of the mailing of the notice by the applicant. A person filing an objection shall send a copy to the applicant.

(d) The board shall consider an objection, and may hold a hearing on the objection after notice to all interested persons, before acting upon an application for a permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 8.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1433.4.

The board shall supervise diversion and use of water under a permit issued under this article for the protection of all lawful users of water, for protection of beneficial uses, including instream beneficial uses, the ability to meet water quality objectives, and for compliance with permit conditions. The permit may require a person who extracts water stored under the permit to comply with regulatory and permitting requirements for
 groundwater extraction set by the groundwater sustainability plan or alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6 for the basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 8.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1433.5.

A permit issued under this article shall not result in the creation of a vested right, even of a temporary nature. The permit is subject, at all times, to modification or revocation at the discretion of the board, after the permittee has adequate notice and an adequate opportunity to be heard concerning any proposed modification or revocation. The authorization to divert and use water under the permit shall automatically expire five years after the authorization takes effect, unless an earlier date is specified or the temporary permit is revoked, and shall be junior in priority to any subsequent appropriation not subject to this chapter. The five-year period does not include any time required for monitoring, reporting, or mitigation before or after
 the authorization to divert or use water under the permit. The five-year period is a limitation on the authorization to divert and not a limitation on the authorization for beneficial use of the water diverted to underground storage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 8.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1433.6.

The board may renew a permit issued under this article if the board, in its judgment, concludes that the applicant has exercised due diligence in applying for a permit pursuant to provisions of this division, other than this chapter, and in pursuing that application once it is filed. The board shall process a request for a renewal of a permit issued under this article pursuant to this article. The board may request the permittee to file maps, drawings, or other data furnished with the original application for the permit. Each renewal of a permit issued under this article shall be valid for a period not to exceed five years from the date of renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 8.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.6. Temporary Changes [1435. - 1443.7.]



  ARTICLE 1. Temporary Urgency Changes [1435. - 1442.]

1435.

(a) Any permittee or licensee who has an urgent need to change a point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use from that specified in the permit or license may petition for, and the board may issue, a conditional, temporary change order without complying with other procedures or provisions of this division, but subject to all requirements of this article.

(b) Prior to issuing a change order pursuant to this article, the board shall make all of the following findings:

(1) The permittee or licensee has an urgent need to make the proposed change.

(2) The proposed change may be made without injury to any other lawful user of water.

(3) The proposed change may be made without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses.

(4) The proposed change is in the public interest, including findings to support change order conditions imposed to ensure that the change is in the public interest, and may be made without injury to any other lawful user of the water, and without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, and other instream beneficial uses.

(c) “Urgent need,” for the purposes of this article, means the existence of circumstances from which the board may in its judgment conclude that the proposed temporary change is necessary to
 further the constitutional policy that the water resources of the state be put to beneficial use to the fullest extent of which they are capable and that waste of water be prevented; except that the board shall not find a petitioner’s need to be urgent if the board in its judgment concludes, if applicable, that the petitioner has not exercised due diligence either (1) in petitioning for a change pursuant to provisions of this division other than this article, or (2) in pursuing that petition for change.

(d) The board may delegate to any officer or employee of the board all or any of its functions under this article, as provided in Section 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 11.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1436.

The petition for a temporary change order shall be completed in accordance with the rules of the board, and the petitioner shall pay the fee required by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 867, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1437.

Before making the findings required by Section 1435, the board shall review available records, files, and decisions that relate to the rights of other legal users of water, consult with representatives of the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and make a field investigation if the investigation is necessary or desirable in the opinion of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 55.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1438.

(a) The board may issue a temporary change order in advance of the notice required by this section. In all cases, whether or not a temporary change order has been issued, the board shall, as soon as practicable after the receipt of a petition, issue and deliver to the permittee or licensee a notice of the change order which includes the information required by the rules of the board.

(b) Publication or posting of the notice shall be as follows:

(1) If the permit or license is for more than three cubic feet per second or for more than 200 acre-feet of storage, and if the change order is to remain in effect for more than 30 days, the notice shall be published by, and at the expense of, the permittee or licensee at the earliest practicable time, not to exceed 20 days from the date of issuance of the notice, in a newspaper having a general circulation and published within the county wherein the point of diversion lies. Proof of publication shall be by copy of the notice as published and made part of an affidavit filed with the board within 10 days of publication.

(2) In all other cases, unless the change order is to be in effect less than 10 days:

(A) The permittee or licensee shall post the notice in at least two conspicuous places in the locality to be affected by the change. Notices shall be posted not later than two days after receipt. An affidavit containing proof of posting shall be filed with the board within seven days of the date of notice.

(B) The board shall send a copy of the notice by registered mail to each person who, in the judgment of the board, could be adversely affected by the temporary change.

(c) Regardless of the rate of diversion or the amount of storage, if the change order is to be in effect less than 10 days, the board shall exercise its discretion with respect to requiring notice, both before and after issuance of the change order, and may require such proof of notice as it deems appropriate.

(d) Any interested person may file an objection to the temporary change with the board, and the board shall send a copy of that objection to the permittee or licensee.

(e) The board shall give prompt consideration to any objection, and may hold a hearing thereon, after notice to all interested persons.

(f) Failure of the permittee or licensee to comply with any requirement of this section shall result in the automatic termination of the temporary change.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 867, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1439.

The board shall supervise diversion and use of water under the temporary change order for the protection of all other lawful users of water and instream beneficial uses and for compliance with change order conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 455, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1440.

A temporary change order issued under this article shall not result in the creation of a vested right, even of a temporary nature, but shall be subject at all times to modification or revocation in the discretion of the board. The authorization to divert and use water under a temporary change order shall automatically expire 180 days after the authorization takes effect, unless an earlier date is specified or the temporary change order is revoked. The 180-day period does not include any time required for monitoring, reporting, or mitigation before or after the authorization to divert or use water under the temporary change order. If the temporary change order authorizes diversion to storage, the 180-day period is a limitation on the authorization to divert and not a
 limitation on the authorization for beneficial use of water diverted to storage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 12.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1441.

A temporary change order issued under this article may be renewed by the board. Requests for renewal shall be processed in the manner provided by this chapter except that the permittee or licensee shall not be required to file duplicate maps, drawings, or other data if they were furnished with the original petition. Each such renewal shall be valid for a period not to exceed 180 days from the date of renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 13.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1442.

This article shall not apply to any permittee or licensee petitioning for a temporary change pursuant to Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 1725).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 14.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Temporary Changes for Diversion to Underground Storage [1443. - 1443.7.]

1443.

(a) Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article: 

(1) “Basin” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(2) “Groundwater sustainability agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(3) “Local agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(b) This article shall not apply to diversions within the groundwater basins identified in paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) of, or subdivision (c) of, Section 10720.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 15.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1443.1.

(a) A groundwater sustainability agency or a local agency that is a permittee or a licensee under provisions of this division other than this article, may petition for, and the board may issue, a conditional temporary change order that authorizes the diversion of surface water to underground storage for beneficial use that advances the sustainability goal of a groundwater basin under Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6, without complying with other procedures or provisions of this division, subject to all requirements of this article.

(b) Before issuing a change order pursuant to this article, the board shall make all of the following findings based
 upon a preponderance of the evidence:

(1) The proposed change is for diversion to underground storage for beneficial use consistent with subdivision (a). 

(2) The proposed change does not increase the amount of water the petitioner is authorized to use, enlarge the authorized season of diversion, authorize diversion from a new source, or otherwise in effect initiate a new right. 

(3) The proposed change may be made without injury to any other lawful user of water, including the user’s ability to meet water quality objectives.
 This finding may be satisfied by demonstrating both of the following:

(A) The proposed diversion to underground storage will occur only when flow in the source waterbody exceeds the claims of all known legal users who divert water downstream of the proposed point of diversion.

(B) Storage and extraction from storage in the basin under the proposed change will be subject to accounting methods and reporting requirements established by any of the following:

(i) A groundwater sustainability plan.

(ii) An interim plan.

(iii) An alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6.

(iv) The board, in applying conditions to the temporary change.

(4) The proposed change may be made without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses. If the permit does not include a condition proposed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1443.2, the board shall include in the findings an explanation of why the condition is not included.

(5) The proposed change
 is in the public interest, including findings to support change order conditions imposed to ensure that the water is diverted and used in the public interest, without injury to any lawful user of water, and without unreasonable effect upon fish, wildlife, and other instream beneficial uses.

(6) If there is an adopted groundwater sustainability plan, an interim plan, or an alternative under Section 10733.6 for the basin, the proposed diversion to underground storage is consistent with that plan or alternative.

(c) The board may delegate to any officer or employee of the board all or any of its functions under this article, as provided in Section 7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 15.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1443.2.

(a) The petition for a temporary change order shall be completed in accordance with the rules of the board that specify the information and maps to be included in a petition for change.

(b) (1) A petitioner for a change order shall pay a fee calculated in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525).

(2) Consistent with Section 3 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution and the board’s authority to set fees to promote the
 conservation and utilization of water resources in the public interest, the board may adopt reduced fees under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1525) for applications, petitions, and change orders under this article.

(c) In addition to subdivisions (a) and (b), a petition shall include all of the following:

(1) Evidence that the petitioner has completed any environmental review required by, or the project is exempt from, the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code). To the extent funding is available, the board shall review and comment on any notice of preparation or draft environmental document for a project subject to approval under this article, and include in the board’s comments identification
 of any instream beneficial uses of waters of the state that may be affected by the project. This paragraph is not a limitation on the authority of the board under any other law.

(2) A notification from the Department of Fish and Wildlife that the petitioner has consulted with the Department of Fish and Wildlife at least 30 days before submission of the petition. If the Department of Fish and Wildlife determines that it needs additional time for review, it may provide for a longer consultation period, not to exceed 60 days. The notification shall include a copy of any conditions proposed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(3) A proposed accounting method for storage and extraction of water diverted under the change order that is either of the following:

 (A) Certified to be consistent with the groundwater sustainability plan or alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6 by the groundwater sustainability agency for the basin where the water is proposed to be stored or the local agency responsible for implementing the approved alternative.

(B) If there is no applicable groundwater sustainability plan or alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6, adequate to demonstrate beneficial use of water under the proposed change order and not inconsistent with the department’s standards in Section 356.2 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 15.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1443.3.

(a) As soon as practicable after the receipt of a petition for a temporary change order, the board shall issue and deliver to the petitioner a notice of the petition and a list of persons who, in the judgment of the board, could be adversely affected by the temporary change. The board shall post the notice to its internet website within 10 days of issuing the notice to the petitioner.
